Illinois, session 104th, HB5422.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Creative Workforce Development Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The General Assembly finds that 7Illinois' creative economy relies heavily on gig, freelance, 8and project-based laborers whose contributions are essential 9yet whose jobs are often precarious. It is the policy of the 10State to support the sustainability and mobility of creative 11workers through skills training, business development 12supports, financial and contract literacy, and between-project 13career transition services; to test portable, 14worker-controlled benefits without altering worker 15classification; to set baseline protections for publicly 16funded creative work; and to ensure equitable access across 17regions and underrepresented communities. 18    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:19    "Creative worker" means an individual who earns income 20primarily through independent, freelance, gig, or 21project-based work in one or more of the following fields: 22arts and culture; design; music; film and television; theater   HB5422- 2 -LRB104 19041 HLH 32486 b1and live events; teaching artistry; digital media and content 2creation; creative technology; and related cultural work.3    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 4Opportunity.5    "Eligible worker" means a creative worker who is 6determined, by Department rule, to be eligible for the pilot 7program established under Section 45.8    "Portable benefits" means benefits that are 9worker-controlled; that follow a worker across projects, 10employers, or engagements; and that are administered by an 11eligible sponsor or qualified portable benefit administrator. 12"Portable benefits" includes access pathways to health 13insurance, retirement savings options, paid leave pools, and 14workers' compensation coverage.15    "Publicly funded creative work" means any creative 16services, performances, productions, or deliverables procured 17or sub-granted using State funds, including pass-through 18federal funds administered by the State. 19    "Underrepresented communities" includes, but is not 20limited to, communities historically marginalized by race or 21ethnicity, low-income communities, people with disabilities, 22LGBTQ+ communities, and geographically isolated rural areas. 23    Section 15. Establishment; administering Department.24    (a) The Illinois Creative Workforce Development Program is 25established within the Department. Creative workers may apply   HB5422- 3 -LRB104 19041 HLH 32486 b1for program services under Section 20 under procedures 2determined by the Department by rule.3    (b) The Department shall design, administer, and 4coordinate services statewide and may enter into interagency 5agreements with other State agencies, the Department's Film 6Office, the Illinois Arts Council, or other relevant entities 7to implement this Act. 8    (c) The Department may contract with regional 9intermediaries, community colleges, workforce boards, and 10nonprofit organizations with demonstrated experience serving 11creative workers. 12    Section 20. Program services.13    (a) The Department shall offer or fund training in digital 14tools, creative technologies, production workflows, management 15and entrepreneurship, compliance and safety, and project 16administration. 17    (b) Services may include coaching, access to markets and 18procurement, portfolio development, licensing and rights 19education, marketing, and revenue diversification. 20    (c) Services shall include budgeting, tax compliance for 21independent workers, contract drafting and review, negotiation 22skills, and risk management for project-based work. 23    (d) The Department shall provide navigation services, 24placement assistance, bridge programs, and supportive services 25to facilitate movement between projects or into adjacent   HB5422- 4 -LRB104 19041 HLH 32486 b1high-demand fields. 2    Section 25. Baseline protections for publicly funded 3creative work. 4    (a) The Department shall, by rule, establish minimum 5compensation guidelines for publicly funded creative contracts 6that reflect fair market value, project scope, experience 7level, prevailing standards, and inclusive access. 8    (b) The Department shall, by rule, require: 9        (1) clear written contracts with defined scope of 10    work, deliverables, timelines, ownership and rights, 11    cancellation terms, and dispute resolution; 12        (2) standardized invoicing and payment practices to 13    promote timely payment consistent with State fiscal 14    controls; and 15        (3) disclosure of grant or contract terms in plain 16    language. 17    (c) Publicly funded entities shall certify compliance as a 18condition of award or payment. 19    Section 30. Equity, outreach, and regional balance. 20    (a) The Department shall conduct targeted outreach to 21underrepresented communities and workers lacking access to 22traditional benefits. 23    (b) Program design and awards shall reflect geographic 24balance across Chicago, suburban, downstate, and rural   HB5422- 5 -LRB104 19041 HLH 32486 b1regions, including deployment of regional intermediaries. 2    (c) The Department shall ensure accessibility of program 3materials, facilities, and communications and shall provide 4reasonable accommodations. 5    Section 35. Data collection; reporting; privacy. 6    (a) The Department shall collect program data, 7disaggregated, at a minimum, by race, ethnicity, gender, 8disability status, if voluntarily disclosed, and geography. 9    (b) Annually, the Department shall deliver a report to the 10General Assembly and post the report on the Department's 11website, summarizing participation, services delivered, 12outcomes, the adoption of compensation standards, payment 13timelines, and pilot program results. 14    (c) Personally identifiable information shall be protected 15and reported only in the aggregate. 16    Section 40. Cross-sector integration grants; alignment 17with pipelines and credentials. 18    (a) The Department may award grants or incentives to 19integrate creative skills into other high-demand fields 20through cross-sector partnerships, including: 21        (1) partnerships with teaching artists in education 22    and after-school programs; 23        (2) partnerships with designers and storytellers in 24    public health and community engagement;   HB5422- 6 -LRB104 19041 HLH 32486 b1        (3) partnerships with digital creatives in technology 2    and manufacturing; and 3        (4) partnerships with cultural workers in tourism and 4    place-based development. 5    (b) Grants shall, if practicable, align with recognized 6credentials, registered apprenticeships, or established 7workforce pipelines, and they may support curriculum 8co-development, work-based learning, and employer engagement. 9    (c) Awards under this Section are subject to 10appropriation. 11    Section 45. Portable benefits pilot program; report. 12    (a) The Department shall establish a pilot program to test 13portable, worker-controlled benefits for eligible workers 14without reclassifying workers as employees. Eligible workers 15may apply for the pilot program under procedures determined by 16the Department by rule.17    (b) Subject to appropriation and available matching funds, 18the pilot program may include: 19        (1) pathways to health insurance enrollment or 20    subsidies; 21        (2) retirement savings vehicles with automated or 22    optional contributions; 23        (3) pooled paid leave accounts usable across 24    engagements; and 25        (4) mechanisms to access workers' compensation   HB5422- 7 -LRB104 19041 HLH 32486 b1    coverage for qualifying engagements where permissible 2    under law. 3    (c) Benefits may be administered by qualified portable 4benefit administrators or licensed entities selected through a 5competitive process. The Department may set eligibility, 6portability, contribution, and governance standards by rule. 7    (d) Participation in the pilot program shall not be 8construed to create an employment relationship, joint 9employment, or agency between a worker and any contracting 10entity. 11    (e) The Department shall include pilot program outcomes, 12costs, worker satisfaction, and recommendations in the annual 13report under Section 35.14    (f) This Section is repealed 5 years after the effective 15date of this Act. 16    Section 50. Procurement and grant compliance. 17    (a) The Department shall incorporate the protections in 18Section 25 into its procurement and grantmaking templates and 19guidance. 20    (b) The Department may condition awards on adoption of 21minimum compensation guidelines and timely-payment practices 22and may withhold or recoup funds for material noncompliance 23after providing notice and opportunity to cure. 24    Section 55. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules   HB5422- 8 -LRB104 19041 HLH 32486 b1to implement and administer this Act, including, without 2limitation, rules to establish pilot program operations, 3compensation guidelines, and grant procedures. 4    Section 60. Creative Workforce Fund. The Creative 5Workforce Fund is created as a special fund in the State 6treasury. Subject to appropriation, moneys in the Fund shall 7be used by the Department to carry out this Act, including 8training, grants, pilot program benefits, evaluation, and 9administration. The Fund may receive transfers, 10appropriations, gifts, grants, and awards from public or 11private sources. 12    Section 65. Construction. Nothing in this Act shall be 13construed to limit the rights of workers or to preempt any more 14protective local, State, or federal standards applicable to 15compensation, safety, discrimination, or accessibility. 16    Section 80. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 17Section 5.1038 as follows: 18    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)19    Sec. 5.1038. The Creative Workforce Fund.